Texas statutes.
BUSINESS AND COMMERCE CODE

TITLE 12. RIGHTS AND DUTIES OF CONSUMERS AND MERCHANTS

CHAPTER 608. MANUFACTURER'S WARRANTIES ON AIR CONDITIONING SYSTEMS

Sec. 608.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Air conditioning system" means a heating, ventilation, and air conditioning system that provides heating and cooling to a building.

(2) "Residential real property" has the meaning assigned by Section 22.001.

(3) "Warrantor" means a person who is contractually obligated to repair or replace a product under a warranty agreement.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 815 (H.B. 2110), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 608.002. TRANSFER OF MANUFACTURER'S WARRANTY. (a) If residential real property that includes an air conditioning system as a fixture to the property is conveyed to a new owner, a manufacturer's warranty in effect on that system or a component of that system on the date of the conveyance:

(1) is automatically transferred to the new owner; and

(2) continues in effect as if the new owner was the original purchaser of the system or component, as applicable.

(b) A warrantor continues to be obligated under the terms of a manufacturer's warranty agreement for a warranty transferred under this section and may not charge a fee for the transfer of the warranty.

(c) The transfer of a manufacturer's warranty under this section does not extend the original term of the warranty agreement.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 815 (H.B. 2110), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.